Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5302.
PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF MICHIGAN ENACT:
Sec. 273b. (1) Subject to appropriation, the department shall
create and operate a competitive grant program to provide grants to
recovery community organizations. Each as provided in this section.
Subject to subsection (5), each year, from available funds, the
department shall award $5,000,000.00 in grants under this section
to the following:
(a) Not fewer than 19 certified recovery community
organizations to offer or expand recovery support center services
or recovery community center services to serve individuals seeking
EMR H05009'25 (H-1) d83j20


long-term recovery from substance use disorders.
(b) Nonprofit associations in this state that meet all of the
following requirements:
(i) Have recovery community organizations as members.
(ii) Have a primary purpose of educating about, advocating for,
and increasing awareness of recovery.
(iii) Connect recovery community organizations within this state
to support the certification of recovery community organizations
and to provide technical assistance to recovery community
organizations awarded funding under this section.
(2) Each Subject to subsection (5), each grant that the
department awards under this section shall not exceed $150,000.00
must be as follows:
(a) If the applicant is a recovery community organization, a
minimum of $250,000.00 per applicant. However, the department shall
not award a grant under this section to a recovery community
organization in an amount that exceeds 50% of the organization's
operating budget for the calendar year immediately preceding the
date of the application.
(b) If the applicant is a nonprofit association described in
subsection (1)(b), $250,000.00.
(3) In awarding a grant under this section, the department
shall place priority on prioritize recovery community organizations
that do meet all of the following requirements:
(a) Provide recovery support navigation that includes the
following:
(i) Multiple recovery pathways.
(ii) Assistance for individuals navigating recovery resources
such as detoxification, treatment, recovery housing, support
EMR H05009'25 (H-1) d83j20


groups, peer support, and family support.
(iii) The promotion of community wellness and engagement.
(iv) Recovery advocacy that provides hope and encourages
recovery.
(v) A peer-led, peer-driven organization that offers recovery
to any individual seeking recovery from addiction.
(b) Provide recovery outreach education that includes the
following:
(i) On-site recovery education in the workplace.
(ii) All-staff employee meetings.
(iii) On-site support for employees and family members.
(iv) Connections for employees and family members of employees
suffering from addiction to local recovery resources such as
treatment, recovery housing, and support groups.
(v) Connections with employers to provide recovery advocacy.
(c) Provide recovery activities and events that include the
following:
(i) Safe, ongoing recovery activities and events.
(ii) Opportunities to volunteer and participate in activities
and events.
(iii) Opportunities for family members and supporters of
recovery to be involved.
(iv) Meetings and activities on nutrition, health, and
wellness.
(v) Meetings and activities on mindfulness, meditation, and
yoga.
(d) Are a member of a nonprofit association described in
subsection (1)(b).
EMR H05009'25 (H-1) d83j20


(4) Beginning March 31, 2027, a grant recipient under this
section shall file an annual report with the chairperson of each
standing committee that has jurisdiction over health policy issues
and to the chairpersons of the house of representatives and senate
appropriations committees. The report must include all of the
following information:
(a) An explanation of how grant funds are being spent.
(b) If the grant recipient is a recovery community
organization, all of the following:
(i) The staff-to-participant ratio.
(ii) A description of the types of recovery support services
offered to participants.
(iii) The number of participants receiving recovery support
services during the calendar year and an explanation of how the
participants and services were calculated and reported.
(iv) The average rate of improvement in participant recovery
capital measures for participants served during the previous
calendar year.
(c) The operating budget of the grant recipient for the
calendar year covered by the report, with details on each source of
the grant recipient's income.
(5) If there are insufficient funds available for the grant
award amounts described in this section, the department may reduce
the total number of grants awarded under this section to ensure
that each grant awarded is at least $150,000.00.
(6) This section does not apply beginning October 1, 2031.
Final Page
EMR H05009'25 (H-1) d83j20